Utah statutes.
53-7-219.   Portable fire extinguishers -- Hearings authorized.

The state fire marshal may conduct hearings or proceedings concerning the renewal, revocation, or refusal to issue permits.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

